New York, session 2025-2026, S10162.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 77 to read as follows: 3 77. In the county of Washington, the provisions of this section 4 requiring a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or 5 municipal corporation of the state for which such person shall be chosen 6 or within which such person's official functions are required to be 7 exercised, shall not prevent a person from holding the office of the 8 deputy county attorney of the county of Washington, provided that such 9 person resides in Washington county or an adjoining county within the 10 state of New York; provided, however that any person performing such 11 functions or holding the office of the deputy county attorney in any 12 other county shall be a resident of such county unless otherwise 13 provided by law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15748-01-6